languages/apertium-nog/tests/pbw.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../nog.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../nog.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] voicing of stem-final п":
    тап<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : табаман

  "[twol] voicing and further lenition of stem-final п":
    тап<v><tv><prc_perf> : тавып

  "[twol] voicing of stem-final к":
    шык<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : шыгаман
    шык<v><iv><prc_perf> : шыгып
